Utah statutes.
48-1-28.   Causes of dissolution.
Dissolution is caused:
(1)  Without violation of the agreement between the partners:
(a)  By the termination of the definite term or particular undertaking
specified in the agreement.
(b)  By the express will of any partner when no definite term or particular
undertaking is specified.
(c)  By the express will of all the partners who have not assigned their
interests, or suffered them to be charged for their separate debts, either
before or after the termination of any specified term or particular
undertaking.
(d)  By the expulsion of any partner from the business bona fide in accordance
with such a power conferred by the agreement between the partners.
(2)  In contravention of the agreement between the partners, where the
circumstances do not permit a dissolution under any other provision of this
section, by the express will of any partner at any time.
(3)  By any event which makes it unlawful for the business of the partnership
to be carried on or for the members to carry it on in partnership.
(4)  By the death of any partner.
(5)  By the bankruptcy of any partner or the partnership.
(6)  By decree of court under Section 48-1-29.
